Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Youth Courts.

Sec. 47.12.400.
Youth courts.

The department may use youth courts to hear, determine, and dispose of cases involving a minor whose alleged act that brings the minor within the jurisdiction of AS

47.12.010

—

47.12.260

constitutes a violation of a state law that is a misdemeanor or a violation or constitutes a violation of a municipal ordinance that prescribes a penalty not exceeding the penalties for a class A misdemeanor under state law.

Unless otherwise directed by the commissioner, the jurisdiction of a youth court is coextensive with the boundaries of the municipality in which the youth court is located. Only one youth court may be established within the boundaries of a municipality. Nothing in this subsection prohibits two or more municipalities from operating a single youth court for the municipalities by agreement between them.

A nonprofit corporation may obtain recognition from the commissioner to serve as a youth court. The corporation may exercise only the powers that are delegated to a youth court by the commissioner, and shall exercise those powers as authorized by the corporation’s articles of incorporation and bylaws. The bylaws of the corporation must set out standards and procedures by which the corporation, in its capacity as a youth court,

establishes a system by which the minor may be held accountable for the conduct that brings the minor within the jurisdiction of the youth court by being tried, represented, and adjudicated by the minor’s peers;

guarantees the constitutional rights of the minor that are guaranteed by the state and federal constitutions;

may secure jurisdiction over a minor; the youth court may secure jurisdiction over the minor only with the consent of the minor and the agreement of the minor’s legal custodian;

sets out the process for disposing of matters referred to it for resolution;

provides a process for appeal of a verdict or sentence, and defines the basis for appeals;

reserves the right to refer to the department, under AS

47.12.060(a)

, a matter transmitted to the youth court for disposition in which the minor fails, without good cause, to comply with all requirements ordered by the youth court as a part of sentence imposed on the minor; and

prepares and delivers a report of the disposition of the matter referred to it for resolution to the commissioner.

Subject to the privileges that witnesses have in the courts of this state, the commissioner may compel by subpoena, at a specified time and place, the

appearance and sworn testimony of a person who the commissioner reasonably believes may be able to give information relating to a matter before a youth court; and

production by a person of a record or object that the commissioner reasonably believes may relate to a matter before a youth court.

If a person refuses to comply with a subpoena issued under (d) of this section, the superior court may, upon application of the commissioner, compel obedience by proceedings for contempt in the same manner as in the case of disobedience to the requirements of a subpoena issued by the court or refusal to testify in the court.

The commissioner shall make and keep records of all cases referred to a youth court. The records of a youth court proceeding

relating to a minor who complies with all requirements ordered by the youth court as a part of sentence imposed on the minor shall be sealed by the commissioner and may not be used for any purpose; and

except as to a record described in (1) of this subsection, shall be afforded at least the same protection and are subject to at least the same procedural safeguards in matters relating to access, use, and security as they would be under AS

47.12.310

.

An individual who is a member or an agent of the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation that has obtained recognition from the commissioner to serve as a youth court under this section is immune from suit in a civil action based upon the exercise or performance of or the failure to exercise or perform a discretionary function or a discretionary duty as a member of the board of directors or that has been properly delegated by the board of directors. An individual who tries, represents, or adjudicates a minor in a youth court is immune from suit in a civil action based upon the exercise or performance of or the failure to exercise or perform a discretionary function or a discretionary duty within the individual’s quasi-judicial capacity with the youth court. A nonprofit corporation that has obtained recognition from the commissioner to serve as a youth court is immune from suit in a civil action based upon an act or failure to act for which an individual is granted immunity under this subsection.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 108 SLA 1998; am § 100 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 47.12.410.
Funding for youth courts.

The legislature may appropriate 25 percent of the fines imposed under AS

12.55.035

and collected and separately accounted for by the state under AS

37.05.142

to the department for distribution to youth courts established and operating under AS

47.12.400

. Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 3 ch 110 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 110, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, is effective September 26, 2010.